Utah statutes.
75-2-701.   Scope.

In the absence of a finding of a contrary intention, the rules of construction in this part control the construction of a governing instrument.  The rules of construction in this part apply to a governing instrument of any type, except as the application of a particular section is limited by its terms to a specific type or types of provision or governing instrument.

